Idaho, session 2026, H0936.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Sections 18-7102, Idaho Code, as added in Section 1 of
Senate Bill No. 1326, As Amended, if enacted by the Second Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to
read as follows:
18-7102. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Exigent circumstances" means only those limited, judicially rec-
ognized exceptions to the warrant requirement under section 17, article I of
the constitution of the state of Idaho and the fourth amendment to the United
States constitution.
(2) "Government agent" means any employee or representative of the
state of Idaho, or any political subdivision thereof, or the federal govern-
ment, acting in an official capacity.
(3) "Private land not open to the public" or "private land" means any
privately owned real property, not including any place of habitation or the
associated curtilage, where a person knows or has reason to know that the
person's presence is not permitted pursuant to the provisions of section
18-7008(2)(a), Idaho Code.
(4) "Search warrant" or "warrant" has the same meaning as that term is
defined in section 19-4401, Idaho Code, and shall include an arrest warrant
as described in section 19-507, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Sections 18-7104, Idaho Code, as added in Section 1 of
Senate Bill No. 1326, As Amended, if enacted by the Second Regular Session
of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to
read as follows:
18-7104. FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AGENTS AND LOCAL COORDINATION. Prior to
executing a search warrant on private land pursuant to section 18-7103,
Idaho Code, federal government agents shall should notify the county sher-
iff, unless exigent circumstances exist.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.